Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20262-3279
Districts; plans; period for review and comment; alteration of plans.

All plans submitted by a district under section 2-3276 shall be accorded a thirty-day period for review and comment. Failure to reply within thirty days shall be conclusive that the plans have been endorsed by the reviewing agency. All comments on plans shall be reviewed by the district and alterations of the plans may be made as the district deems appropriate. If any state agency comments indicate a lack of conformance with the goals, criteria, and policies of any outdoor recreation plan, any fish and wildlife plan, or indicate a conflict with state policies or plans approved by the Legislature, such plans shall be altered as deemed necessary by the district prior to proceeding with implementation.

Laws 1978, LB 783, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 326, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 29.